Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 152.713 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "renewable energy" has the same meaning as in KRS
154.20-400.
(2) The Center for Renewable Energy Research and Environmental Stewardship is
hereby created.
(3) The Center for Renewable Energy Research and Environmental Stewardship shall:
(a) Provide leadership, research, support, and policy development in renewable
energy;
(b) Advance the goal of renewable energy;
(c) Promote technologies, practices, and programs that increase efficiency in
energy utilization in homes, businesses, and public buildings;
(d) Emphasize energy policies that would result in cost-conscious, responsible
development of Kentucky's energy resources and a commitment to
environmental quality;
(e) Promote partnerships among the Commonwealth's[state's] postsecondary
education institutions, private industry, and nonprofit organizations to actively
pursue federal research and development resources that are dedicated to
renewable energy;
(f) Promote the continued development of public-private partnerships dedicated
to promoting energy efficiency through education and outreach;
(g) Establish research priorities with approval of the board of directors created in
subsection (4) of this section, relating to renewable energy, and develop
procedures and processes for awarding research grants to eligible recipients as
defined by the board and to the extent that funding is available;
(h) Collaborate with the Office of Energy Policy to avoid duplication of efforts,
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/17/2025 12:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1876
provide appropriate data and information, and support the implementation of
Kentucky's comprehensive energy strategy; and
(i) Carry out other activities to further the efficient and environmentally
responsible use of renewable energy.
(4) (a) There is hereby created a governing board of directors to provide policy
direction, establish a strategic research agenda and operating policies, and
provide financial and operational oversight for the Center for Renewable
Energy Research and Environmental Stewardship.[ The initial board shall be
appointed within sixty (60) days following July 15, 2008.]
(b) The board shall consist of thirteen (13) members:
1. One (1) member to represent the Office of Energy Policy as designated
by its executive director;
2. Three (3) members representing postsecondary education interests who
shall be appointed by the Governor;
3. One (1) member to be designated by the governing body of the
Kentucky Science and Technology Corporation;
4. One (1) member from an energy conservation organization who shall be
appointed by the Governor;
5. The secretary of the Economic Development Cabinet or the secretary's
designee;
6. One (1) member who shall be a recognized consumer advocate to be
appointed by the Governor;
7. Three (3) members to represent companies that are focused on
renewable energy who shall be appointed by the Governor;
8. One (1) member who shall represent environmental interests to be
appointed by the Governor; and
9. One (1) member who shall be selected to represent local government
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/17/2025 12:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1876
interests to be appointed by the Governor.
(c) The members appointed by the Governor shall serve two (2) year terms and
may be reappointed. The members representing specific agencies shall serve
for as long as the respective agencies determine appropriate.
(5) The board shall:
(a) Adopt operating procedures, including a meeting schedule;
(b) Meet at least quarterly;
(c) Select a chair and co-chair annually who may be reelected, not to exceed three
(3) consecutive terms;
(d) Establish working groups or subcommittees of the board as the board
determines is needed;
(e) Establish qualifications and job descriptions, set the compensation and
benefits, and employ staff as it determines necessary to carry out its
responsibilities under this section; and
(f) Provide an annual program and financial report to the Legislative Research
Commission within ninety (90) days of the close of each fiscal year.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/17/2025 12:56 PM Jacketed